Wyoming, session 2026, HB0186.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 21-9-105 is created to read:

HB0186

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0460
21-9-105. Instruction in human growth and development
required; duties of department of education; exceptions.

(a) Each school district shall provide instruction
for all students in grades five (5) through (12) in human
growth and development. The instruction required under this
section shall include, at a minimum:

(i) A video of an ultrasound, conducted in
high-definition, that shows the early fetal development of
organs;

(ii) A video that demonstrates fertilization and
the stages of human development from conception until
birth.

(b) The state department of education shall determine
and publish on its website a list of materials suitable to
satisfy the educational requirements specified in this
section. The department shall make materials available to
parents upon request.

HB0186

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0460
(c) Each school district shall establish a process by
which the parents or guardian of a student may have the
student excused from the educational requirements specified
in this section upon written request by the parents or
guardian.

(d) The state department of education shall, by rule,
establish a process by which the department shall conduct
annual audits of school districts to ensure that school
districts are complying with the educational requirements
specified in this section.

(e) No school district or the state department of
education shall adopt or establish any instructional
material or model curricula that conflict with the
instruction required under this section.

Section 2. W.S. 21-9-101(b)(i) by creating a new
subparagraph (P) is amended to read:

21-9-101. Educational programs for schools;
standards; core of knowledge and skills; special needs
programs; class size requirements; cocurricular activities.
HB0186

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0460

(b) Each school district within the state shall
provide educational programs sufficient to meet uniform
student content and performance standards at the level
established by the state board of education in the
following areas of knowledge and skills:

(i) Common core of knowledge:

(P) Human development education, in
accordance with W.S. 21-9-105.

Section 3. This act shall apply beginning with the
2026-2027 school year.

Section 4. The state board of education, the state
department of education and each school district shall take
all actions necessary to implement this act.

HB0186

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0460
Section 5.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2026.

(b) Sections 4 and 5 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
HB0186